Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,170
Violations; penalty.

Any person, firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation which violates any provision of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act for which a penalty is not otherwise provided shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 170.